Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Chapter 1 General Provisions
§ 30-1-131.
Provisions for indemnity in certain contracts; invalidity.

All agreements, covenants or promises contained in, collateral to or affecting any agreement pertaining to any well for oil, gas or water, or mine for any mineral, which purport to indemnify the indemnitee against loss or liability for damages for:

Death or bodily injury to persons;

Injury to property; or

Any other loss, damage, or expense arising under either (i) or (ii) from:

The sole or concurrent negligence of the indemnitee or the agents or employees of the indemnitee or any independent contractor who is directly responsible to such indemnitee; or

From any accident which occurs in operations carried on at the direction or under the supervision of the indemnitee or an employee or representative of the indemnitee or in accordance with methods and means specified by the indemnitee or employees or representatives of the indemnitee, are against public policy and are void and unenforceable to the extent that such contract of indemnity by its terms purports to relieve the indemnitee from loss or liability for his own negligence. This provision shall not affect the validity of any insurance contract or any benefit conferred by the Worker’s Compensation Law [§§

27-14-101

through

27-14-805

] of this state.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 46, § l; 1977, ch. 145, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting contracts exempting employer from liability for employee's personal injuries, see art. 19, § 7, Wyo. Const.

For provision that contracts exempting employers from liability shall be void, see §

27-1-105

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Intent of section. —

The clear language of this section voids and makes unenforceable any agreement to the extent that it seeks to indemnify an indemnitee for his own negligence — regardless of the character of the negligence sought to be protected. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

This section embodies the legislative public policy determination that contract provisions indemnifying against loss or liability resulting from one's own negligence in an agreement pertaining to wells for oil, gas or water, or mines for minerals, shall be void and unenforceable. Northwinds of Wyo. v. Phillips Petroleum Co., 779 P.2d 753,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1989).

Statute did not render the insurer's two insurance policies covering the insured a nullity so that any coverage was more illusory than real and any liability had to be the insured's alone; while indemnity agreements were generally impermissible, insurance contracts supplied an exception to the rule, and the Wyoming legislature expressly allowed the enforcement of any insurance contract. Lexington Ins. Co. v. Precision Drilling Co., L.P., 830 F.3d 1219, 2016 U.S. App. LEXIS 13565 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2016).

This section does not violate state or federal equal protection clauses.

Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

And no unconstitutional infringement on freedom to contract.—

Since this section has only an incidental effect on the main agreement between the parties and the state interest in adopting the statute is significant, no constitutional infirmity arises with respect to the freedom to contract. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

Agreement not rendered void. —

The indemnity provision of a Well and Lease Service Master Contract did not violate Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-1-131

; the phrase “or otherwise rendering services in or in connection with any well” in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-1-132

did not apply to delivering oil by truck to a tank battery at an above-ground separation facility far removed from any well. Gainsco Ins. Co. v. Amoco Prod. Co., 2002 WY 122, 53 P.3d 1051,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2002).

Indemnification clause in a contract between a contractor and welding service was enforceable, despite Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-1-131

, which applies only to contracts for work performed directly on oil, gas, and water wells. The water lines the welding service was working on at the time of the worker's injury transported water after it had been separated from oil, and it was some distance from the well. Union Pac. Res. Co. v. Dolenc, 2004 WY 36, 86 P.3d 1287,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2004).

Indemnity defense not available where claim premised upon contractnot covered by section. —

A claim of defense arising out of tort concepts, such as indemnity, is not available where the claim of the plaintiff is premised upon contract and the contract is not one which indemnifies the indemnitee against the consequences of its own negligence. Centric Corp. v. Drake Bldg. Corp., 726 P.2d 1047,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 628

(Wyo. 1986).

Section should be construed to preclude indemnity only when indemnitee is negligent.

Heckart v. Viking Exploration, Inc., 673 F.2d 309, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 20933 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

And not when indemnitee liable on respondeat superior theory.—

This section should not preclude indemnity when the indemnitee is not negligent but is liable on the respondeat superior theory. Heckart v. Viking Exploration, Inc., 673 F.2d 309, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 20933 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

Indemnification is not prohibited when indemnitee does not seek indemnification for own negligence.

Hull v. Chevron U.S.A., Inc., 812 F.2d 590, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 2280 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1987).

Indemnity clause in contract reading “contractor agrees to protect, indemnify, and save operator harmless from and against all claims, demands and causes of action of every kind and character arising in favor of contractor's employees, … on account of bodily injuries, … in any way resulting from the … negligent acts or omissions of contractor and/or contractor's, … employees,” was not void under this section, and therefore the operator, found liable under respondeat superior theory for the contractor's negligence as well as its own, could seek to be indemnified for the negligence apportioned to the contractor by the jury. Hull v. Chevron U.S.A., Inc., 602 F. Supp. 75, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 22669 (D. Wyo. 1985), aff'd, 812 F.2d 590, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 2280 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1987).

Employer may indemnify contractor, to extent of damage sufferedbecause of employer's negligence. —

A contract entered into between an employer and a contractor, pertaining to a well for oil or gas, which provided that the employer would indemnify the contractor for all loss it might sustain as a result of the employer's work under the contract except such loss as might be caused by the sole negligence of the contractor, was enforceable by the contractor — who was sued by the employer's employee, who suffered injury during the course of his employment and was granted worker's compensation — against the employer, to the extent of any damage suffered because of the sole or concurrent negligence of the employer. Cities Serv. Co. v. Northern Prod. Co., 705 P.2d 321,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1985).

Unit operating agreement rendered void. —

A unit operating agreement between a unit operator and owners of nonoperating working interests was rendered void and unenforceable by the application of this section and §

30-1-132

to the extent that it required nonnegligent nonoperators to contribute proportionately to the operator's settlement of claims for personal injuries arising from the operator's negligence. Bolack v. Chevron, U.S.A., 963 P.2d 237,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1998).

Attorney fees improperly denied. —

Trial court abused its discretion in relieving an oil company of any negligence after an equipment company's employee was injured, but then denying its attorney fees in defending itself against the equipment company; an indemnification provision in the parties'
master service contract was not a basis to be relied upon by the trial court in denying the oil company's request for attorney fees.
Pennant Serv. Co. v. True Oil Co., Llc, 2011 WY 40,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Mar. 8, 2011).

Applied

in

Reliance Ins. Co. v. Chevron U.S.A. Inc., 713 P.2d 766,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 464

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Schneider Nat'l, Inc. v. Holland Hitch Co., 843 P.2d 561,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Law of Indemnity in Wyoming: Unravelling the Confusion,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 811 (1996).

§ 30-1-132.
Provisions for indemnity in certain contracts; definition.

The term “agreement pertaining to any well for oil, gas, or water, or mine for any mineral” as used in W.S.

30-1-131

, means any agreement or understanding, written or oral, concerning any operations related to drilling, deepening, reworking, repairing, improving, testing, treating, perforating, acidizing, logging, conditioning, altering, plugging, or otherwise rendering services in or in connection with any well drilled for the purpose of producing or disposing of oil, gas or other minerals, or water, and designing, excavating, constructing, improving, or otherwise rendering services in or in connection with any mine shaft, drift, or other structure intended for use in the exploration for or production of any mineral, or an agreement to perform any portion of any such work or services or any act collateral thereto, including the furnishing or rental of equipment, incidental transportation, and other goods and services furnished in connection with any such service or operation.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 46, § 2; 2011, ch. 129, § 206.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “W.S.

30-1-131

” for “section 1 hereof.”

Collecting plant waste fluids not “rendering services” in connectionwith oil well. —

One who digs pits to collect waste fluids from a fire at an oil and gas separation plant is not “rendering services” in connection with an oil well. This is true even if the separation plant processes gas which is eventually reinjected into the oil field to repressurize oil wells. Reliance Ins. Co. v. Chevron U.S.A., 713 P.2d 766,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 464

(Wyo. 1986).

Agreement not rendered void. —

The indemnity provision of a Well and Lease Service Master Contract did not violate Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-1-131

; the phrase “or otherwise rendering services in or in connection with any well” in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-1-132

did not apply to delivering oil by truck to a tank battery at an above-ground separation facility far removed from any well. Gainsco Ins. Co. v. Amoco Prod. Co., 2002 WY 122, 53 P.3d 1051,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2002).

Indemnification clause in a contract between a contractor and a welding service was enforceable, despite Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-1-131

, which applies only to contracts for work performed directly on oil, gas, and water wells. The water lines that the welding service was working on at the time of the worker's injury transported water after it had been separated from oil, and it was some distance from the well. Union Pac. Res. Co. v. Dolenc, 2004 WY 36, 86 P.3d 1287,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2004).

Unit operating agreement rendered void. —

A unit operating agreement between a unit operator and owners of nonoperating working interests was rendered void and unenforceable by the application of §

30-1-131

and this section to the extent that it required nonnegligent nonoperators to contribute proportionately to the operator's settlement of claims for personal injuries arising from the operator's negligence. Bolack v. Chevron, U.S.A., 963 P.2d 237,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

Northwinds of Wyo., Inc. v. Phillips Petro. Co., 779 P.2d 753,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 30-1-133.
Provisions for indemnity in certain contracts; exemption.

Provided that nothing in this act [§§

30-1-131

through

30-1-133

] shall be construed to deprive an owner of the surface estate of the right to secure an indemnity from any lessee, operator, contractor or other person conducting operations for the exploration or production of minerals on such owner’s land.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 46, § 3.